Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-406
Mayor and council members; election.

Elections for officers listed in section 19-415 shall be conducted as provided in the Election Act. The positions for which candidates are to be nominated or elected shall appear on the ballot in the order listed in section 19-415.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 5, p. 153;

Laws 1913, c. 21, § 2, p. 87;

R.S.1913, § 5292;

Laws 1919, c. 35, § 1, p. 116;

C.S.1922, § 4515;

Laws 1923, c. 141, § 3, p. 346;

C.S.1929, § 19-405;

R.S.1943, § 19-406;

Laws 1969, c. 112, § 2, p. 520;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 327, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 510.

Election Act, see section 32-101.